Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.230

Provision of security.

(1) The arbitral tribunal may require the party requesting an interim measure to provide appropriate security in connection with the measure.

(2) The arbitral tribunal shall require the party applying for a preliminary order to provide security in connection with the order unless the arbitral tribunal considers it inappropriate to do so.

[ 2015 c 276 s 23.]